Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
134

FIREARMS,
AMMUNITION AND DANGEROUS WEAPONS

Part I. General Regulations

Section

134-1 Definitions

134-2 Permits to acquire

134-2.5 Permits for motion picture films or
television

program production

134-3 Registration, mandatory, exceptions

134-3.5 Disclosure for firearm permit and
registration

purposes

134-4 Transfer, possession of firearms

134-5 Possession by licensed hunters and minors;
target

shooting; game hunting

134-6 Repealed

134-6.5 Relief from federal firearms mental health

prohibitor

134-7 Ownership or possession prohibited, when;
penalty

134-7.2 Prohibition against seizure of firearms or

ammunition during emergency or disaster;
suspension

of permit or license

134-7.3 Seizure of firearms upon disqualification

134-7.5 Seizure of firearms in domestic abuse
situations;

requirements; return of

134-8 Ownership, etc., of automatic firearms,
silencers,

etc., prohibited; penalties

134-9 Licenses to carry

134-10 Alteration of identification marks
prohibited

134-10.5 Storage of firearm; responsibility with
respect to

minors

134-11 Exemptions

134-12 Repealed

134-12.5 Forfeiture of firearms, ammunition, deadly
or

dangerous weapons, and switchblade knives;
when

134-13 Revocation of permits

134-14 Report

134-15 Restriction of materials for manufacture
of pistols

or revolvers

134-16 Restriction on possession, sale, gift, or
delivery of

electric guns

134-17 Penalties

134-18 Qualified immunity for physicians,
psychologists, or

psychiatrists who provide information on
permit

applicants

134-21 Carrying or use of firearm in the commission
of a

separate felony; penalty

134-22 Possession of a firearm with intent to
facilitate

the commission of a felony drug offense;
penalty

134-23 Place to keep loaded firearms other than
pistols and

revolvers; penalty

134-24 Place to keep unloaded firearms other than
pistols

and revolvers; penalty

134-25 Place to keep pistol or revolver; penalty

134-26 Carrying or possessing a loaded firearm on
a

public highway; penalty

134-27 Place to keep ammunition; penalty

134-28 Explosive devices; prohibitions; penalty

Part II. Firearms, Dealers' Licenses

134-31 License to sell and manufacture firearms;
fee

134-32 License to sell and manufacture firearms;
conditions

134-33 Punishment for violations of section
134-32

134-34 National emergency, when

Part III. Dangerous Weapons

134-51 Deadly weapons; prohibitions; penalty

134-52 Switchblade knives; prohibitions; penalty

134-53 Butterfly knives; prohibitions; penalty

Cross References

Zero tolerance policy for drugs and weapons, see
§302A-1134.6.

Case Notes

Where plaintiff asserted that §§134-6 and 134-9 violated
rights guaranteed by Article I and the Second, Fifth, Ninth, and Fourteenth
Amendments of the U.S. Constitution, defendants' motions to dismiss plaintiff's
complaint granted; among other things, plaintiff did not have standing to
challenge this chapter on the basis of an alleged deprivation of Second
Amendment or Ninth Amendment rights, this chapter is not an impermissible bill
of attainder with respect to plaintiff, and this chapter imposes no impairment
of a contractual right possessed by plaintiff. 548 F. Supp. 2d 1151.

Defendant could not claim that state firearms regulations
infringed upon rights protected by Second Amendment. 82 H. 143, 920 P.2d 357.

Right to bear arms may be regulated by the State in a
reasonable manner. 82 H. 143, 920 P.2d 357.

Appellate court precluded from remanding convictions for
retrial as no lesser included offense of a felon in possession of a firearm or
ammunition under this chapter. 82 H. 517 (App.), 923 P.2d 934.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next